Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202379-10,148
Extraordinary Increase in Special Education Expenditures Act, how cited.

Sections 79-10,148 to 79-10,151 shall be known and may be cited as the Extraordinary Increase in Special Education Expenditures Act.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 39.